Hawaii statutes.
§325-34 Exemptions. Section 325-32
shall be construed not to require the vaccination or immunization of any person
for three months after a duly licensed physician, physician assistant, advanced
practice registered nurse, or an authorized representative of the department of
health has signed two copies of a certificate stating the name and address of
the person and that because of a stated cause the health of the person would be
endangered by the vaccination or immunization, and has forwarded the original
copy of the certificate to the person or, if the person is a minor or under
guardianship, to the person's parent or guardian, and has forwarded the
duplicate copy of the certificate to the department for its files.

No person shall be subjected to vaccination,
revaccination or immunization, who shall in writing object thereto on the
grounds that the requirements are not in accordance with the religious tenets
of an established church of which the person is a member or adherent, or, if
the person is a minor or under guardianship, whose parent or guardian shall in
writing object thereto on such grounds, but no objection shall be recognized
when, in the opinion of the director of health, there is danger of an epidemic
from any communicable disease. [L 1945, c 171, pt of §1; am L 1947, c 165,
§1(b); RL 1955, §49-34; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §19; am L 1967, c 23, §4; HRS
§325-34; am L 1974, c 6, §2(2); gen ch 1985; am L 2009, c 151, §13; am L 2014,
c 45, §8]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next